tests/data/group-after-join-mono.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzœ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="abaiss/er__vblex">
      <e><p><l>-jy</l>  <r><s n="vblex"/><j/>jy<s n="prn"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>
  <section id="main" type="standard">
    <e> <i>hasG</i><par n="abaiss/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a</l><r><g><b/>a</g></r></p></e>
    <e> <i>hasG</i><par n="abaiss/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e> <i>notG</i><par n="abaiss/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a</l><r><g><b/>a</g></r></p></e>
    <e> <i>notG</i><par n="abaiss/er__vblex"/></e>
  </section>
</dictionary>
